Maryland, session 2025, HB0657.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–209.
(a) (1) The Commission shall examine alternatives to the construction of a new
transmission line in a service area[, including the use of an existing transmission line of
another company,] if THE USE OF AN ALTERNATIVE:
[(1)] (I) [the existing transmission line] is convenient to the service area;
[or]
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0657*

HOUSE BILL 657
[(2)] (II) [the use of the transmission line] will best promote economic and
efficient service to the public;
(III) WILL BEST MAINTAIN HISTORICAL, ENVIRONMENTAL, OR
AGRICULTURAL PRESERVATION AREAS; OR
(IV) WILL AVOID ANY OVERLAP WITH A LOT, PARCEL, OR TRACT
OF LAND THAT IS:
1. LOCATED WITHIN A PLANNED GROWTH AREA
IDENTIFIED IN THE LOCAL JURISDICTION’S COMPREHENSIVE PLAN; OR
2. ZONED FOR RESIDENTIAL USE OR MIXED USE WITH A
RESIDENTIAL COMPONENT.
(2) ALTERNATIVES TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF A NEW TRANSMISSION
LINE INCLUDE:
(I) THE USE OF AN EXISTING TRANSMISSION LINE OF ANOTHER
COMPANY;
(II) THE USE OF AN EXISTING RIGHT–OF–WAY;
(III) RECONDUCTORING AN EXISTING TRANSMISSION LINE; AND
(IV) UNDERGROUNDING A TRANSMISSION LINE.
(b) In considering the use of an [existing transmission line] ALTERNATIVE under
subsection (a) of this section, the Commission need not consider whether the company that
owns the line has a franchise in a service area.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.